src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/V-2Y-viozzted_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup




Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - viõzzted: # Verb 'pop/naksahtaa' - full paradigm
     viõzzted+V+Inf: viõzzted
     viõzzted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viõzztam
     viõzzted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: viõzztak
     viõzzted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viõzzat
     viõzzted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: viõzztep
     viõzzted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: viõzzteʹped
     viõzzted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: viõzzte 
     viõzzted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: viõzztet
     viõzzted+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: viõzzât
     viõzzted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: viõzztem
     viõzzted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: viõzztiǩ
     viõzzted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: viõzzti
     viõzzted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: viõzztim
     viõzzted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: viõzztid
     viõzzted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: viõzzte
     viõzzted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: viõzzteš
     viõzzted+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: viõzztam
     viõzzted+V+Pot+Sg1: viõzzteʹžem
     viõzzted+V+Pot+Sg2: viõzzteʹžiǩ
     viõzzted+V+Pot+Sg3: viõzztež
     viõzzted+V+Pot+Pl1: viõzzteʹžep
     viõzzted+V+Pot+Pl2: viõzzteʹžid
     viõzzted+V+Pot+Pl3: viõzzteʹže
     viõzzted+V+Pot+Sg4: viõzzteʹžet
     viõzzted+V+Pot+ConNeg: viõzzteʹže
     viõzzted+V+Cond+Sg1: viõzzteʹčem
     viõzzted+V+Cond+Sg2: viõzzteʹčiǩ
     viõzzted+V+Cond+Sg3: viõzzteʹči
     viõzzted+V+Cond+Pl1: viõzzteʹčim
     viõzzted+V+Cond+Pl2: viõzzteʹčid
     viõzzted+V+Cond+Pl3: viõzzteʹče
     viõzzted+V+Cond+Sg4: viõzzteʹčeš
     viõzzted+V+Cond+ConNeg: viõzzteʹče
     viõzzted+V+Imprt+Sg2: viõzzât
     viõzzted+V+Imprt+Sg3: viõzztââǥǥas
     viõzzted+V+Imprt+Pl1: viõzztâkap
     viõzzted+V+Imprt+Pl2: viõzzteʹǩed
     viõzzted+V+Imprt+Pl3: viõzztâkaz
     viõzzted+V+Imprt+ConNegII: viõzztuku
     viõzzted+V+Actio+Ess: viõzzteʹmmen
     viõzzted+V+Actio: viõzztem
     viõzzted+V+Act+PrsPrc: viõzzteei
     viõzzted+V+Act+PrfPrc: viõzztam
     viõzzted+V+Pass+PrfPrc: viõzztum
     viõzzted+V+VAbess: viõzzteǩâni
     viõzzted+V+Ger+Ess: viõzzteen
     viõzzted+V+Ger+Instr: viõzzteeʹl
     viõzzted+V+Der/musj+N+Sg+Nom: viõzztummuš
